Tennessee, session 114, SB2520.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-49-104(e)(1)(A), is amended by
deleting the language "eighty percent (80%) of the privilege tax" and substituting "seventy-eight
percent (78%) of the privilege tax".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-49-104(e), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(4) Two percent (2%) of the privilege tax collected under this section must be
distributed by the council to the state treasurer and allocated to rural and urban at-risk
youth programs. The department of economic and community development shall
establish, within existing resources, a program for the administration and distribution of
funds in accordance with this subdivision (e)(4).
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2520
012086
- 1 -